Missouri, session 2026, SB1447.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1583, to read as
follows:
376.1583. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and may be cited as the "Patients First Act".
2. The department of commerce and insurance shall
implement and enforce the nondiscrimination protections in
Section 2706 of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42
U.S.C. Section 300gg-5, by ensuring that no group health
plan or health insurance issuer offering group or individual
health insurance coverage shall discriminate with respect to
participation under the plan or coverage against any health
care provider who is acting within the scope of that
provider's license or certification under state law.
3. (1) A health benefit plan, as defined in section
376.1350, shall not discriminate against a health care
provider based on the provider's licensure with respect to
reimbursement or participation in any plan or insurance
program.

SB 1447 2
(2) All health care providers shall be reimbursed at
the same rate for the same service as long as such service
is within the provider's scope of practice.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent a group health plan or a health insurance issuer
from establishing varying reimbursement rates based on
quality or performance measures.
4. Nothing in this section shall apply to physicians
licensed under chapter 334.
5. The department of commerce and insurance may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓